Utah statutes.
48-2c-213.   Certificates issued by the division.

(1)  Anyone may apply to the division for a certificate of existence for a domestic company, a certificate of authorization for a foreign company, or a certificate that sets forth any facts of record in the office of the division.

(2)  A certificate of existence or authorization shall state:

(a)  the domestic company's name or the foreign company's name as registered in this state;

(b) (i)  that the domestic company is duly formed under the law of this state and the date of its formation; or

(ii)  that the foreign company is authorized to transact business in this state;

(c)  that all fees, taxes, and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if:

(i)  payment is reflected in the records of the division; and

(ii)  nonpayment affects the existence or authorization of the domestic or foreign company;

(d)  that its most recent annual report required by Section 48-2c-203 has been filed with the division;

(e)  that articles of dissolution have not been filed with the division; and

(f)  other facts of record in the office of the division that may be requested by the applicant.

(3)  Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate issued by the division may be relied upon as conclusive evidence of the facts set forth in the certificate.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session

